Utah statutes.
31A-36-108.   Required disclosures.

(1)  With an application for a life settlement, a life settlement provider or life settlement producer shall furnish to the owner the disclosures the commissioner may require under Section 31A-36-119, in a separate document signed by the owner and the life settlement provider or life settlement producer, no later than the time the application for the life settlement is signed by all the participants in the life settlement.

(2)  A life settlement provider shall furnish to the owner the disclosures the commissioner may require under Section 31A-36-119, conspicuously displayed in the life settlement or in a separate document signed by the owner and the life settlement provider, no later than the time the life settlement is signed by all participants in the life settlement.

